Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-139
Inspection of business by State Fire Marshal or local fire prevention personnel.

The department may request the State Fire Marshal to inspect any business credentialed or applying for a credential under the Uniform Credentialing Act for fire safety pursuant to section 81-502. The State Fire Marshal shall assess a fee for such inspection pursuant to section 81-505.01 payable by such business. The State Fire Marshal may delegate such authority to make such inspections to qualified local fire prevention personnel pursuant to section 81-502.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 39.